Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 1 General Provisions
49-4-20.
Drug test required for applicants and recipients of certain government benefits; penalties for violation; reapplication; confidentiality of records.

As used in this Code section, the term “established drug test” means the collection and testing of bodily fluids administered in a manner equivalent to that required by the Mandatory Guidelines for Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services or other professionally valid procedures approved by the department; provided, however, that where possible and practicable, a swab test shall be used in lieu of a urinalysis.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations for an established drug test that includes the following:

Which illegal drugs will be the subject of testing;

Methods for assuring minimal privacy intrusions during collection of body fluid specimens for such testing;

Methods for assuring proper storage, transportation, and handling of such specimens in order to ensure the integrity of the testing process;

The identity of those persons entitled to the results of such tests and methods for ensuring that only authorized persons are given access to such results;

A list of laboratories qualified to conduct established drug tests;

A list of approved substance abuse treatment providers;

Procedures for persons undergoing drug testing prior to the collection of body fluid specimens for such testing, so as to provide information regarding the use of any drug pursuant to a medical prescription or as otherwise authorized by law which may affect the results of such test; and

A requirement that any applicant who demonstrates proof of active and current Medicaid benefits shall pay a drug screening application fee of no more than $17.00, and no authorized test examiner shall conduct a drug test if an applicant demonstrates active and current Medicaid benefits unless the applicant presents a receipt proving that he or she has paid the required drug screening application fee. Eligible applicants who do not have active and current Medicaid benefits shall be responsible for paying the full cost of administering the drug test upon presentation to an authorized examiner.

The department shall require a drug test consistent with subsection (b) of this Code section to screen an applicant or recipient of food stamps at any time a reasonable suspicion exists that such applicant or recipient is using an illegal drug. The department may use any information obtained by the department to determine whether such reasonable suspicion exists, including, but not limited to:

An applicant’s or recipient’s demeanor;

Missed appointments and arrest or other police records;

Previous employment or application for employment in an occupation or industry that regularly conducts drug screening; and

Termination from previous employment due to unlawful use of a controlled substance or controlled substance analog or prior drug screening records of the applicant or recipient indicating unlawful use of a controlled substance or controlled substance analog.

The cost of drug testing shall be the responsibility of the individual tested, provided that the individual does not submit proof of active and current Medicaid benefits to subsidize the cost of such drug testing pursuant to paragraph (8) of subsection (b) of this Code section. No assistance payment shall be delayed because of the requirements of this Code section, and any payments made prior to the department’s receipt of a test result showing a failure shall be recoverable.

Any recipient of food stamps who tests positive for controlled substances as a result of a drug test required under this Code section shall be ineligible to receive food stamps as follows:

For a first positive result, the recipient shall be ineligible for food stamps for one month and until he or she tests negative in a retest;

For a second positive result, the recipient shall be ineligible for food stamps for three months and until he or she tests negative in a retest; and

For a third and each subsequent positive result, the recipient shall be ineligible for food stamps for one year and until he or she tests negative in a retest unless the individual meets the requirements of subsection (f) of this Code section.

The department shall:

Provide notice of possible drug testing based on reasonable suspicion to each individual at the time of application. Dependent children under the age of 18 shall be exempt from the drug testing requirement;

Advise each individual to be tested, before the test is conducted, that he or she may, but is not required to, advise the agent administering the test of any prescription or over the counter medication he or she is taking;

Require each individual to be tested to sign a written acknowledgment that he or she has received and understands the notice and advice provided under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection;

Assure each individual being tested a reasonable degree of dignity while producing and submitting a sample for drug testing, consistent with the state’s need to ensure the reliability of the sample;

Specify circumstances under which an individual who fails a drug test has the right to take one or more additional tests;

Inform an individual who tests positive for a controlled substance and is deemed ineligible for food stamps for one year pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (d) of this Code section that the individual may reapply for food stamps six months after the date of the positive drug test if he or she meets the requirements of subsection (f) of this Code section; and

Provide any individual who tests positive with a list of substance abuse treatment providers approved by the department which are available in the area in which he or she resides. Neither the department nor the state shall be responsible for providing or paying for substance abuse treatment.

An individual who tests positive for an illegal drug and is denied food stamps for one year may reapply for food stamps after six months if the individual can document the successful completion of a substance abuse treatment program offered by a provider approved by the department. The cost of any drug testing provided under this Code section and substance abuse treatment shall be the responsibility of the individual being tested and receiving treatment. An individual who fails a drug test administered pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section may reapply for food stamps under this subsection only once.

If a parent is deemed ineligible for food stamps as a result of failing a drug test conducted under this Code section, the parent may choose to designate another individual to receive food stamps for the parent’s minor child. The designated individual must be an immediate family member or, if an immediate family member is not available or the family member declines the option, another individual approved by the department. The designated individual shall be subject to possible drug testing based on a reasonable suspicion. If the designated individual tests positive for controlled substances, he or she shall be ineligible to receive benefits on behalf of the child.

The results of any drug test performed according to this Code section shall not be subject to disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, relating to inspection of public records. Such results shall not be used as a part of a criminal investigation or criminal prosecution. Such results shall not be used in a civil action or otherwise disclosed to any person or entity without the express written consent of the person tested or his or her heirs or legal representative. All such records shall be destroyed and deleted five years after the date of the test.

No testing shall be required by the provisions of this Code section for any person whom the department determines is significantly hindered, because of a physical or mental handicap or developmental disability, from doing so or for any person enrolled in an enhanced primary care case management program operated by the Department of Community Health, Division of Medical Assistance to serve frail elderly and disabled beneficiaries to improve the health outcomes of persons with chronic health conditions by linking primary medical care with home and community based services. In addition, no testing shall be required by the provisions of this Code section for any individuals receiving or on a waiting list for long-term services and supports through a non-Medicaid home and community based services program or for any individual residing in a facility such as a nursing home, personal care home, assisted living community, intermediate care facility for the intellectually or developmentally disabled, community living arrangement, or host home.

The department shall adopt rules to implement this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 844, § 1/HB 772.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references.

Drug-free workplace programs, §

34-9-410

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 enactment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 205 (2014).

49-4-21.
Photo requirement on electronic benefits transfer cards for food stamps.

The department shall require that all electronic benefits transfer cards which include food stamp benefits contain a photograph of one or more members of a household who are authorized to use such food stamp benefits. The department is authorized to promulgate regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this Code section.

This Code section shall become effective on January 1, 2016.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 844, § 1/HB 772.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2016.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 enactment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 205 (2014).

49-4-22.
Eligibility for aid under federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.

An individual who was convicted under any state or federal law of an offense which has as an element the possession, use, or distribution of a controlled substance, as such term is defined in Code Section 16-13-21, and which is or would be classified as a felony under the laws of this state shall not be eligible for the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program while he or she is serving any term of imprisonment. If such individual was not sentenced to imprisonment, he or she shall be eligible for such program, provided that he or she remains compliant with the applicable general and special conditions of probation imposed. If such individual is sentenced to a term of imprisonment, after release from confinement, he or she shall be eligible for such program, provided that he or she remains compliant with the applicable general and special conditions of probation or parole imposed. If such individual violates the terms of probation as determined by court order or violates the terms of parole as determined by an order of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, he or she shall lose eligibility for such program. If such individual successfully completes the original sentence imposed, he or she shall remain eligible for such program.

Any individual eligible for aid pursuant to this Code section shall be required to meet all other requirements for eligibility for such program.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 11-1/SB 367.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2016.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 enactment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).